Hawaii, session 2025, SB494.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The auditor shall conduct a financial audit of each charter school under the state public charter school commission.  For each charter school, the financial audit shall include: (1)  A list of financial expenditures for the past three years; (2)  Financial information concerning faculty; and (3)  The school's cash on hand balance. (b) The auditor shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 2. No later than one year after the auditor's submission of the report to the legislature under section 1 of this Act, the state public charter school commission shall take action based on the recommendations made by the auditor. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the auditor to complete the financial audit pursuant to section 1 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the auditor for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.